en: Rye flour type 85, Rye flour T85
fr: Farine de seigle T85
hr: raženo brašno tip 85
it: farina di segale tipo 85
pl: mąka żytnia typ 850, mąka żytnia 850

en: rye flour type 130, Rye flour T130
fr: farine de seigle type 130, Farine de seigle T130
hr: raženo brašno tip 130
it: farina di segale tipo 130

en: Rye flour type type 1250
hr: raženo brašno T1250, raženo brašno tip 1250
it: farina di segale tipo tipo 1250

en: wholemeal rye flour, wholegrain rye flour, whole grain rye flour
bg: пълнозърнесто ръжено брашно, ръжено пълнозърнесто брашно
cs: celozrnná žitná mouka
da: fuldkornsrugmel
de: Roggenvollkornmehl
es: flor de harina integral de centeno, harina integral de centeno
fi: täysjyväruisjauho, täysjyväruisjauhoa
fr: farine de seigle complète, farine complète de seigle, farine de seigle complet
hr: integralno raženo brašno, brašno od cjelovitog zrna raži, brašno od integralni raži, raženo brašno od cijelog zrna, raženo brašno iz cijelog zrna, brašno iz cijelog zrna raži, raženo brašno od cjelovitog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű rozsliszt
it: farina di segale integrale
lv: rudzu pilngraudu milti
nb: fullkornsrugmel
nl: volkoren roggemeel
pl: mąka żytnia pełnoziarnista, mąka żytnia razowa, pełnoziarnista mąka żytnia
pt: farinha integral de centeio
sv: fullkornsrågmjöl, fullkornsmjöl av råg

en: dextrinated rye flour
de: dextriniertes Roggenmehl
es: harina de centeno dextrinada
fr: farine de seigle dextrinée
hr: dekstrinirano raženo brašno
hu: dextrinált rozsliszt
it: farina di segale destrinata
nl: gedextrineerd roggemeel

en: rye malt flour
de: Roggenmalzmehl
fi: ruismallasjauho
fr: farine de seigle maltée
hr: raženo sladno brašno
it: Farina di malto di segale
nl: gemoute roggemeel
sv: rågmaltmjöl

en: sifted rye flour
da: sigtet rugmel
de: gesiebtes Roggenmehl, Roggenmehl gesiebt
fi: lestyruisjauho, ruissihtijauho
hr: prosijano raženo brašno
it: farina di segale setacciata
sv: siktat rågmjöl, rågsiktmjöl, rågsikt

en: pregelatinized rye flour
de: Roggenquellmehl
hr: prethodno želatinizirano raženo brašno
it: farina di segale pregelatinizzata
ro: făină de secară pregelatinizată

en: millet flour
de: Hirsemehl
es: harina de mijo
fi: hirssijauho
fr: farine de millet
hr: brašno od prosa
hu: kölesliszt
it: farina di miglio
pl: mąka jaglana

en: whole grain millet flour
de: Hirsevollkornmehl, Hirse-Vollkornmehl, Hirsevollmehl
hr: brašno od cijelog zrna prosa
it: farina di miglio integrale

en: chestnut flour
de: Kastanienmehl
eo: kaŝtana faruno
es: harina de castaña
fr: farine de châtaigne
hr: kestenovo brašno
it: farina di castagne
nl: kastanjemeel

en: broad bean flour
bg: бобено брашно
ca: farina de fava
de: Bohnenmehl
es: Harina de habas
fi: härkäpapujauho
fr: farine de fève, farine de fèves
hr: grahovo brašno
hu: lóbabliszt, széles bab liszt
it: farina di fave
nl: bonenmeel, veldbonenmeel

en: flax flour, flaxseed flour
bg: брашно от ленено семе
de: Flachsmehl, Leinmehl
es: semilla de lino amarillo, semillas de lino amarillo, semillas de lino marron
fi: pellavansiemenjauho
fr: farine de lin, farine de graines de lin
hr: laneno brašno
it: farina di lino
pl: mąka lniana, mąka z lnu
ro: făină din seminte de in
sv: linfrömjöl

en: sunflower seed flour
de: Sonnenblumenkernmehl
es: harina de semillas de girasol
fi: auringonkukansiemenjauho
fr: farine de graines de tournesol
hr: brašno sjemenki suncokreta
it: farina di semi di girasole
sv: solrosfrömjöl

en: reduced-fat sunflower seed flour
hr: brašno sjemenki suncokreta smanjene masti

en: soya flour, soy flour, soybean meal
bg: соево брашно
bs: sojino brašno
ca: Farina de soja
cs: sójová mouka
da: Sojamel, sojabønnemel
de: Sojamehl, Sojabohnenmehl
es: harina de soja, semola de soja
fi: soijajauho
fr: farine de soja
he: קמח סויה
hr: sojino brašno, punomasno sojino brašno
hu: szójaiszt
it: farina di soia
nl: sojabloem, soja bloem, sojameel, sojapoeder, sojabonenmeel
pl: Mąka sojowa
pt: farinha de soja
ro: făină de soia, faina de soia
ru: Соевая мука
sl: teksturirana sojina moka
sr: sojino brašno
sv: sojamjöl, sojabönsmjöl, mjöl av sojabönor
tr: soya unu

en: defatted soy flour
cs: odtučněná sójová mouka

en: restructured soya flour
it: farina di soia ristrutturata

en: soya flour restructured and rehydrated
it: farina di soia ristrutturata e reidratata

en: low fat soy flour
fr: farine de soja degraissée
hr: obezmašćeno sojino brašno, odmašćeno sojino brašno
it: farina di soia sgrassata, farina di soia senza grassi
pl: odtłuszczona mąka sojowa
ro: făină de soia degrasată, faina de soia degrasata